Utah statutes.
31A-23b-210.   Place of business and residence address -- Records.

(1) (a)  A licensee under this chapter shall register and maintain with the commissioner:

(i)  the address and telephone numbers of the licensee's principal place of business; and

(ii)  a valid business email address at which the commissioner may contact the licensee.

(b)  If a licensee is an individual, in addition to complying with Subsection (1)(a), the individual shall register and maintain with the commissioner the individual's residence address and telephone number.

(c)  A licensee shall notify the commissioner within 30 days of a change of any of the following required to be registered with the commissioner under this section:

(i)  an address;

(ii)  a telephone number; or

(iii)  a business email address.

(2)  Except as provided under Subsection (3), a licensee under this chapter shall keep at the principal place of business address registered under Subsection (1), separate and distinct books and records of the transactions consummated under the Utah license.

(3)  Subsection (2) is satisfied if the books and records specified in Subsection (2) can be obtained immediately from a central storage place or elsewhere by online computer terminals located at the registered address.

(4) (a)  The books and records maintained under Subsection (2) shall be available for the inspection by the commissioner during the business hours for a period of time after the date of the transaction as specified by the commissioner by rule, but in no case for less than the current calendar year plus three years.

(b)  Discarding books and records after the applicable record retention period has expired does not place the licensee in violation of a later-adopted longer record retention period.



Enacted by Chapter 341, 2013 General Session

